Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2326.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-CLEGISLATIVE DISTRICTSSection 1801-C. Population deviation requirement.(a) Requirement.--(1) To the extent practicable, senatorial and representative districts shall be drawn with the fewest number of divisions to counties and municipalities within a 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 population of 2% above or below the ideal population.(2) An election district may not be split in the drawing of district lines.(3) Districts shall respect communities of interest to the extent practicable in compliance with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).(b) Subsequent redistricting.--The requirements of this section shall apply to all redistricting of legislative districts after the effective date of this subsection.(c) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community of interest." An area with recognized similarities of interests, including, but not limited to, ethnic, racial, economic, tribal, social, cultural, geographic or historic identities. Counties, municipalities, townships and school districts may constitute communities of interest so long as the subdivision is a community of people who have broadly shared interests and representational needs that are greater than those of other overlapping communities of interest. A community of interest shall not include common relationships with political parties or political candidates."Deviation." The difference of a legislative district's population from the ideal population."Ideal population." The population goal for legislative districts in a redistricting plan in accordance with the following:(1) For representative districts, the total population of this Commonwealth divided by the number of representative districts as provided by section 16 of Article II of the 20260HB2326PN3101 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Constitution of Pennsylvania.(2) For senatorial districts, the total population of this Commonwealth divided by the number of senatorial districts as provided by section 16 of Article II of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2326PN3101 - 3 - 123456